Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1306
County officers; signatures and seals; duty to report to Secretary of State.

It shall be the duty of the county clerk to report to the Secretary of State, on or before the first day of February of each year, the names of all the county officers with their official signatures and seals of their respective offices. When any change is made in the incumbent of any county office, the change shall be forthwith reported by the county clerk to the Secretary of State, who shall preserve and record such lists with changes subsequently made therein.

Laws 1879, § 90, p. 379;

R.S.1913, § 5610;

C.S.1922, § 4929;

C.S.1929, § 26-1006;

R.S.1943, § 23-1306;

Laws 1955, c. 76, § 1, p. 230.